Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2504.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 28 of the General Laws entitled "LABOR AND LABOR RELATIONS"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 61
WAREHOUSE WORKER PROTECTION ACT
28-61-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Warehouse Worker Protection Act".
28-61-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Defined time period" means any unit of time measurement equal to or less than the
duration of an employee's shift, and includes hours, minutes, and seconds and any fraction thereof.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and training.
(3) "Director" means director of the department of labor and training.
(4) "Employee" means a nonexempt employee who works at a warehouse distribution
center.
(5)(i) "Employee work speed data" means information an employer collects, stores,
analyzes, or interprets relating to an individual employee's performance of a quota, including, but
not limited to, quantities of tasks performed, quantities of items or materials handled or produced,
rates or speeds of tasks performed, measurements or metrics of employee performance in relation

to a quota, and time categorized as performing tasks or not performing tasks.
(ii) "Employee work speed data" does not include qualitative performance assessments,
personnel records, or itemized wage statements, except for any content of those records that
includes employee work speed data, as defined in this definition.
(6) "Employer" means a person who directly or indirectly, or through an agent or any other
person, including through the services of a third-party employer, temporary service, or staffing
agency or similar entity, employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or working conditions
of one hundred (100) or more employees at a single warehouse distribution center or one thousand
(1,000) or more employees at one or more warehouse distribution centers in the state.
(7) "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited
liability partnership, limited liability company, business trust, estate, trust, association, joint
venture, agency, instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity, whether domestic or
foreign.
(8) "Quota" means a work standard under which an employee is assigned or required to
perform at a specified productivity speed, or perform a quantified number of tasks, or to handle or
produce a quantified amount of material, within a defined time period and under which the
employee may suffer an adverse employment action, if the employee fails to complete the
performance standard.
(9)(i) "Warehouse distribution center" means an establishment as defined by any of the
following North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) Codes, however that
establishment is denominated:
(A) 493110 for General Warehousing and Storage.
(B) 423 for Merchant Wholesalers, Durable Goods.
(C) 424 for Merchant Wholesalers, Nondurable Goods.
(D) 454110 for Electronic Shopping and Mail-Order Houses.
28-61-3. Disclosure of quotas.
(a) Each employer shall provide to each employee, upon hire, a written description of each
quota to which the employee is subject, including the quantified number of tasks to be performed
or materials to be produced or handled, within the defined time period, and any potential adverse
employment action that could result from the failure to meet the quota. The requirement to disclose
also applies to any changes in the quota.
(b) Nothing in this section requires an employer to use quotas or monitor work speed data.
An employer that does not monitor this data, has no obligation to provide it.
(c) New or modified quotas shall be disclosed in writing at least two (2) days in advance
LC005054/SUB A - Page 2 of 5

or their implementation and include notice of the effective date. No disciplinary action which
relates to an employee's compliance with a new or modified quota shall be taken until at least two
(2) days following the required written disclosure.
28-61-4. Meals and rest periods.
An employee shall not be required to meet a quota that prevents compliance with meal or
rest periods, use of bathroom facilities, including reasonable travel time to and from bathroom
facilities, or occupational health and safety laws in the labor laws or department standards. An
employer shall not take adverse employment action against an employee for failure to meet a quota
that does not allow a worker to comply with meal and rest periods, use of bathroom facilities, or
occupational health and safety laws, labor laws, or for failure to meet a quota that has not been
disclosed to an employee.
28-61-5. Employee information request.
(a) Employees may request from the employer the written description of the quota, and a
copy of the employee's own speed data as well as the aggregated work speed data for comparable
employees working in the facility.
(b) Upon request from an employee under subsection (a) of this section, the employer shall
have twenty-one (21) days to provide information on the employee's own speed data as well as the
aggregated work speed data for comparable employees working in the facility. Each employee can
make no more than one request for data every ninety (90) days unless there is a pending disciplinary
action or the request is made contemporaneous with an employee performance review. The
employer shall include, on its written notice of new or modified quotas, the manner in which an
employee can request this data.
28-61-6. Unlawful retaliation.
There shall be a rebuttable presumption of unlawful retaliation if an employer in any
manner discriminates, retaliates, or takes any adverse action against any employee because an
employee exercises their rights pursuant to this chapter. The rebuttable presumption of unlawful
retaliation shall only be in place for ninety (90) days following the employee's exercise of rights
under this chapter or the termination of their employment. Following that, the employee's burden
of proof shall be a preponderance of evidence standard.
28-61-7. Enforcement.
(a) The department of labor and training shall adopt rules to implement and enforce this
chapter. The director shall be authorized to enforce this chapter and to assess damages payable to
the employee and civil penalties.
(b) A current or former employee may bring an action for injunctive relief to obtain
LC005054/SUB A - Page 3 of 5

compliance with this chapter and may, upon prevailing, recover costs and reasonable attorney's
fees.
28-61-8. Severability.
The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision or its application is held
invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect
without the invalid provision or application.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005054/SUB A
========
LC005054/SUB A - Page 4 of 5